Utah statutes.
32B-4-405.   Unlawful sale, offer for sale, or furnishing to interdicted person.

(1)  A person may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product to a known interdicted person.

(2)  This section does not apply to the sale, offer for sale, or furnishing of an alcoholic product to an interdicted person:

(a)  under an order of a health care practitioner who is authorized by law to write a prescription; or

(b)  administered by a hospital or health care practitioner authorized by law to administer the alcoholic product for medicinal purposes.

